North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-04.1 Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children
15.1-04.1-02.
Compact on educational opportunity for military children — State council — Appointment.

The state council on educational opportunity for military children consists of:

The following voting members:

The superintendent of public instruction, who shall serve as the chairman;

The superintendent of a school district that includes a high concentration of military children, appointed by the governor;

A representative of a military installation, appointed by the governor;

One legislator, appointed by the chairman of the legislative management;

One representative of the executive branch of government, appointed by the governor; and

Any other individuals recommended by the members of the state council listed in subdivisions a through e; and

The following nonvoting members:

The compact commissioner appointed under section 15.1-04.1-03; and

The military family education liaison, appointed under section 15.1-04.1-04.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; 2013, ch. 146, § 2.

15.1-04.1-03.
Compact commissioner — Appointment — Duties.

The governor shall appoint a compact commissioner who shall be responsible for the administration and management of the state’s participation in the compact on educational opportunity for military children.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; 2013, ch. 146, § 3.

15.1-04.1-04.
Military family education liaison — Appointment — Duties.

The state council on educational opportunity for military children shall appoint a military family education liaison to assist military families and the state in facilitating the implementation of the compact on educational opportunity for military children.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; 2013, ch. 146, § 4.